Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 3

Medical Care for the Aged

71-2-301. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Applicant” means a person requesting medical assistance under this part;

“Department” means the department of human services;

“Medical assistance” means vendor payments or other payments for drugs in behalf of any person in need of this form of medical assistance as determined by department standards; and

“Recipient” means a person receiving medical assistance under the terms of this part.

Acts 1961, ch. 96, § 1; 1971, ch. 43, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1(a, b); T.C.A., §§ 14-1601, 14-3-101.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Cross-References. Comprehensive health insurance pool for uninsurable and underinsured, title 56, ch. 7, part 23.

71-2-302. Determination of amount of medical assistance.

The amount of medical assistance that any person shall receive in the form of drugs under this part shall be determined by measuring the income and resources of such person against the statewide standards provided in §71-2-303(3) and shall be approved by the regional director or a designated agent and the county mayor of the county in which such person resides.

Acts 1961, ch. 96, § 3; 1971, ch. 43, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., §§ 14-1603, 14-3-102; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

71-2-303. Duties of department.

The department shall:

Supervise the administration of medical assistance;

Make such rules and regulations and take such action as may be necessary or desirable for carrying out of this part, to the end that equitable treatment shall be afforded to individuals in similar circumstances. All rules and regulations made by the department shall be binding on the counties and shall be complied with by the respective regional directors;

Establish statewide standards for determining the amount of medical assistance that any person shall receive;

Employ personnel for the administration of this part in conformity with title 8, chapter 30, and the rules and regulations of the department of human resources; and

Publish an annual report and such interim reports as may be necessary.

Acts 1961, ch. 96, § 4; 1971, ch. 43, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 14-1604, 14-3-103; Acts 2012, ch. 800, § 49.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 800, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subdivision (4), shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Excellence, Accountability, and Management (T.E.A.M.) Act of 2012.”

71-2-304. Appeal to department by applicant or recipient.

If an application is not acted upon by the regional director, or a designated agent, and the county mayor within a reasonable time after the filing of the application, or is denied in whole or in part, or if any award of medical assistance is modified or cancelled under any provision of this part, the applicant or recipient may appeal to the department in the manner and form prescribed by the department, and shall be afforded a reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair hearing by the department. Written notice of a right to a fair hearing shall be given by the county office to each applicant and recipient at such time as the county office takes any action concerning the amount awarded to the individual or the action on the application of the individual.

Acts 1961, ch. 96, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., §§ 14-1605, 14-3-104; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

71-2-305. Review on motion of department — Notice to applicants or recipients — Hearing — Decision final.

The department may also, upon its own motion, review any decision of a regional director, or a designated agent, and county mayor, and may consider any application upon which a decision has not been made by the regional director, or a designated agent, within a reasonable time. The department may make such additional investigation as it may deem necessary, and shall make such decision on such application as in its opinion is justified and in conformity with this part. Applicants or recipients affected by such decisions of the department shall be notified of such decision in writing, and shall, upon request, be given reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair hearing by the department. All decisions of the department shall be final and shall be binding upon the county involved and shall be complied with by the regional director or a designated agent.

Acts 1961, ch. 96, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., §§ 14-1606, 14-3-105; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

71-2-306. Recipient receiving property or income — Notice required — Recovery — Fraudulently obtaining aid or disposing of property — Penalty.

If, at any time during the certification for medical assistance, the recipient becomes possessed of any property, real or personal, or income in excess of the amount stated in such recipient's application for medical assistance or transfers any of such recipient's property, real or personal, it shall be the duty of the recipient to immediately notify the local county office of the department. Any medical assistance paid after the recipient has come into possession of property, real or personal, or income, or has transferred any of such recipient's property, real or personal, that renders the recipient ineligible to receive medical assistance under the rules and regulations of the department, shall be recoverable in a suit by the state as a debt due the state.

Whoever:

Knowingly obtains, or attempts to obtain, or aids, or abets any person to obtain by means of a willfully false statement or representation or by impersonation, or other fraudulent device, medical assistance to which such person is not entitled or medical assistance greater than that to which such person is justly entitled; or

With intent to defraud, aids or abets in buying or in any way disposing of the property, either personal or real, of a recipient of medical assistance, without the consent of the department;

commits a Class E felony and is punishable accordingly, except such acts shall be punished as Class A misdemeanors where the amount involved is less than five hundred dollars ($500).

Acts 1961, ch. 96, § 12; 1965, ch. 13, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A., §§ 14-1612, 14-3-106; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6, 103.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of §40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also §39-11-114.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure (Robert E. Kendrick), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1220.

71-2-307. Charge for assistance in obtaining aid — Misdemeanor.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to directly or indirectly either charge or receive anything of value for assisting any person in making application to the proper authorities of this state for medical assistance under this part.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1961, ch. 96, § 13; T.C.A., §§ 14-1613, 14-3-107; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

71-2-308. Improper use of names of recipients — Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person, except for purposes directly connected with the administration of this chapter, to solicit, disclose, receive, make use of, authorize or knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of, any list or names of, or any information concerning, persons applying for or receiving medical assistance, directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files or communications of the department or divisions of the department, or acquired in the course of the performance of official duties.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1961, ch. 96, § 14; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A., §§ 14-1614, 14-3-108; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.